Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1241.06
Motorboat or
personal watercraft; age restrictions; boating safety course; fee.

(1)(a) No person under fourteen years of age shall operate
a motorboat or personal watercraft on the waters of this state.

(b) No person under sixteen years of age shall operate a motorboat
or personal watercraft on the waters of this state with an individual in tow
behind the motorboat or personal watercraft.

(2) Effective January 1, 2012, no person born after December 31, 1985, shall operate a motorboat or
personal watercraft on the waters of this state unless he or she has successfully
completed a boating safety course approved by the commission and has been
issued a valid boating safety certificate.

(3) The commission may charge
a fee of no more than ten dollars for a boating safety course required by
this section.

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 107;

Laws 2003, LB 305, § 22;

Laws 2011, LB105, § 1.